exercise3/fin_cons_grad_rules_with_errors.xfst
! A set of rules for Finnish consonant gradation
! Copyright (c) 1987 by Lauri Karttunen for twolc,
! adapted for xfst by Mathias Creutz

! Clear away any old data that might be in the system
clear stack

! Read lexicon and make a finite-state network of it
read lexc fin_cons_grad_lexicon.lexc
define Lexicon ;
regex Lexicon ;

! Definitions
define Cons         [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m |
                      n | p | r | s | t | v | x | z | ' ] ;
define Vowel        [ a | e | i | o | u | y | ä | ö ] ;
define Liquid       [ l | r ] ;
define ClosedOffset %^ Cons [ Cons | .#. ] ;

! Rules

! Consonant gradation:
! Single k, p, and t are realized as zero, v, and d,
! respectively, in the beginning of a closed syllable.
define ConsGrad k -> 0,
                p -> v,
                t -> d || [ h | Liquid | Vowel ] _ Vowel ClosedOffset ;

! Geminate gradation:
! Geminate stops k, p and t are shortened to
! single stops in a closed syllable.
define GemGrad k -> 0 || k _ Vowel ClosedOffset .o.
               p -> 0 || p _ Vowel ClosedOffset .o.
               t -> 0 || t _ Vowel ClosedOffset ;

! Gradation after nasals:
! Stops k, p and t assimilate to the preceding nasal
! consonant in the weak grade.
define GradNasal k -> g || n _ Vowel ClosedOffset .o.
                 p -> m || m _ Vowel ClosedOffset .o.
                 t -> n || n _ Vowel ClosedOffset ;

! Gradation of k after VV:
! k weakens to a syllable boundary marker between
! a pair of identical vowels following another vowel.
define kGradAfterVV k -> ' || Vowel a _ a ClosedOffset .o.
                    k -> ' || Vowel e _ e ClosedOffset .o.
                    k -> ' || Vowel i _ i ClosedOffset .o.
                    k -> ' || Vowel o _ o ClosedOffset .o.
                    k -> ' || Vowel u _ u ClosedOffset .o.
                    k -> ' || Vowel y _ y ClosedOffset .o.
                    k -> ' || Vowel ä _ ä ClosedOffset .o.
                    k -> ' || Vowel ö _ ö ClosedOffset ;

! Gradation of k between u/y:
! k weakens to v between u's and y's.
define kGradHighLabials k -> v || Cons u _ u ClosedOffset .o.
                        k -> v || Cons y _ y ClosedOffset ;

! Gradation of k after liquids or h:
! k weakens to j before e after a liquid or h.
define kGradhLiquids k -> j || [ Liquid | h ] _ e ClosedOffset ;

! Gradation of t after liquids:
! t assimilates to the preceding liquid in the weak grade.
define tGradLiquids t -> l || l _ Vowel ClosedOffset .o.
                    t -> r || r _ Vowel ClosedOffset ;

! Weak grade of poika, aika:
! Exceptionally, poja.., aja.. instead of *poia.., *aia.. in the
! weak grade of poika, aika.
define poikaAikaGrad i -> j || .#. [ p o | a ] _ a ClosedOffset ; 

! Weak grade of ruoka:
! Exceptionally, either ruoa.. or ruua.. in the weak grade of
! ruoka. The replacement is optional here (->) because the
! o can also stay an o.
define ruokaGrad o (->) u || .#. r u _ a ClosedOffset ;

! Remove end of stem marker
define CleanUp %^ -> 0 ;

! Compose lexicon with the rules
define LexiconWithRules Lexicon .o.
                        ConsGrad .o.
                        GemGrad .o.
                        GradNasal .o.
                        kGradAfterVV .o.
                        kGradHighLabials .o.
                        kGradhLiquids .o.
                        tGradLiquids .o.
                        GradNasal .o.
                        ConsGrad .o.
                        GemGrad .o.
                        poikaAikaGrad .o.
                        ruokaGrad .o.
			            CleanUp ;
regex LexiconWithRules ;

! Output lexical forms
upper-words

! Output surface forms
lower-words
